Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1408
Business with which the individual is associated or business association, defined.

Business with which the individual is associated or business association shall mean a business: (1) In which the individual is a partner, limited liability company member, director, or officer; or (2) in which the individual or a member of the individual's immediate family is a stockholder of closed corporation stock worth one thousand dollars or more at fair market value or which represents more than a five percent equity interest or is a stockholder of publicly traded stock worth ten thousand dollars or more at fair market value or which represents more than ten percent equity interest. An individual who occupies a confidential professional relationship protected by law shall be exempt from this section. This section shall not apply to publicly traded stock under a trading account if the filer reports the name and address of the stockbroker.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 12;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 305;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 67.